Idaho statutes. Title 25 ANIMALS
Chapter 11 STATE BRAND BOARD
§ 25-1148. Brand book.

It shall be the duty of the state brand inspector from time to time as it may be necessary, but at least every two (2) years, to cause to be published in book form a list of all brands on record at the time of publication. In the years when the brand book is not issued, the state brand inspector may issue a supplement to the brand book theretofore issued containing the additional brands or changes in ownership of brands between the time of the last publication and the time of issuing such supplement. The brand book shall contain the facsimile of all brands recorded together with the owners’ names and post-office addresses. Brand records shall be arranged in convenient form for reference. It shall be the duty of the state brand inspector to furnish free of charge to each sheriff in this state one (1) copy of said brand book and supplement, in whose office it shall be kept open for inspection by all persons. Brand books and supplements may be sold outright or by subscription to the general public at a price to be determined by the state brand inspector which price shall cover the cost of the publications.

History.

1905, p. 352, § 13; am. R.C., § 1233; am. 1911, ch. 217, § 7, p. 698; reen. C.L., § 1233; am. 1919, ch. 116, § 3, p. 403; C.S., § 1926; I.C.A.,§ 24-1010; am. 1937, ch. 135, § 6, p. 216; am. 1943, ch. 59, § 1, p. 126; am. 1949, ch. 160, § 4, p. 346; am. 1973, ch. 168, § 17, p. 339; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 27, p. 111.

§ 25-1149. Disposition of recording fees.

All fees received for the recording and renewal of brands under the provisions of chapter 11, title 25, Idaho Code, shall be credited to the brand recording account, which the state controller is authorized and directed to establish in the agency asset fund in the state treasury. All interest earned from investment of moneys in the brand recording account shall accrue to the account.

History.

1943, ch. 70, § 4, p. 147; am. 1945, ch. 128, § 1, p. 195; am. 1947, ch. 88, § 7, p. 149; am. 1973, ch. 168, § 5, p. 339; am. 1977, ch. 183, § 5, p. 510; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 28, p. 111; am. 1994, ch. 180, § 38, p. 420.

§ 25-1150. Brand recordings open to public — Evidence.

The brand recordings kept by the state brand inspector shall be open to the inspection of the public and shall be prima facie evidence of the facts recited therein in any of the courts of this state.

History.

1905, p. 369, § 6; reen. R.C., § 1252; am. 1917, ch. 101, § 6, p. 377; reen. C.L., § 1252; C.S., § 1944; I.C.A.,§ 24-1206; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 29, p. 111; am. 1996, ch. 90, § 3, p. 271.

§ 25-1151. Deceptive and infringing brands — Prevention of use.

The state brand board shall have the right to adopt such rules and regulations as it may prescribe to prevent the use of deceptively similar brands in the state of Idaho and to prevent the use of infringing brands, and is hereby authorized to cancel any brand in the state of Idaho of priority below any brand which it shall infringe.

History.

1947, ch. 88, § 9, p. 149; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 30, p. 111.

§ 25-1152 — 25-1159. [Reserved.]

The maximum fee which shall be charged by the state brand inspector and his deputies for brand inspection shall be:

One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) for each head of cattle;

Ten dollars ($10.00) for each head of horses, mules, and asses.

A minimum fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be charged by the state brand inspector and his deputies for each brand inspection certificate issued, whether for cattle, horses, mules, or asses, or a combination thereof. The minimum brand inspection fee shall apply only in those cases when a brand inspector must travel from his assigned duty post. There shall be an equine farm service fee in an amount to be set by the state brand board, not to exceed fifty-five dollars ($55.00), for each case a brand inspector must travel from his assigned duty post to complete a brand inspection certificate for horses, mules, or asses, which fee shall be in addition to any brand inspection certificate or other written permit requested by the owner or owners of a horse, mule, or ass under any other provisions of law. Livestock auctions and feedlots currently approved by the Idaho state department of agriculture are exempt from the equine farm service fee.

The minimum fee for brand inspection services at any normally scheduled livestock auction sale is fifty dollars ($50.00) per day and shall be paid by the livestock auction sale, whether or not the inspection fee received from the owners of livestock inspected equals the minimum fee. If the fees paid by the owners of livestock inspected at the sale exceed the minimum fee, the actual amount of fees collected shall be paid, rather than the minimum amount.

The fee for brand inspection services at any livestock auction sale that is not a normally scheduled livestock auction sale shall be:

Eighteen dollars ($18.00) per hour for each hour that each brand inspector spends engaged in the performance of brand inspection services at the livestock auction sale;

A mileage rate as established by the state board of examiners per mile per vehicle for each mile that said brand inspector(s) must travel to and from the sale from his assigned duty post.

The state brand board may adopt a schedule or schedules of fees that are below the maximum fees and may adjust such schedule or schedules from time to time whenever such board finds that the cost of administering and enforcing the laws of the state of Idaho for brand inspection of livestock can be maintained with such below-maximum fees. All such fees shall be paid by the owner of the cattle, horses, mules, and asses and credited to the state brand account.

All brand inspection fees, and all other fees required by law to be collected by the brand inspector, are due and payable at the time of inspection, but the brand board may, by rule, allow all of such fees to be paid on a schedule that requires payment at least monthly, after receiving a request for such delayed payment schedule and after such request is approved by the state brand inspector. The brand board may require a security deposit to ensure the prompt payment of all fees owed to the state. Failure to pay as required shall be cause for the brand inspector to file an action in the district court of the county wherein the inspection was made for the amount of all fees owed, plus all costs and reasonable attorney’s fees associated with the action plus interest at the rate specified in section 28-22-104, Idaho Code, on the amount owed from the due date.
(7) Any brand inspector who must travel beyond the border of the state of Idaho to investigate a possible violation of this chapter is entitled to a mileage rate, as established by the state board of examiners, per mile per vehicle for each mile that the brand inspector must travel to and from his assigned duty post, and eighteen dollars ($18.00) per hour for each hour that each brand inspector spends engaged in the investigation. The minimum fee for each brand inspector, not including mileage, shall be the actual hours worked, or thirty-six dollars ($36.00) per day, or the hourly inspection fees, whichever is greater.

The minimum fee, not including mileage, shall be the actual hours worked, or thirty-six dollars ($36.00) per day, or the inspection fees as set forth in subsection (1) of this section, whichever is greater.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-1106A, as added by 1959, ch. 91, § 1, p. 203; am. 1969, ch. 190, § 1, p. 559; am. 1973, ch. 168, § 4, p. 339; am. 1975, ch. 23, § 1, p. 36; am. 1976, ch. 180, § 1, p. 652; am. 1977, ch. 183, § 4, p. 510; am. 1987, ch. 61, § 1, p. 109; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 31, p. 111; am. 1993, ch. 122, § 1, p. 311; am. 1997, ch. 105, § 2, p. 246; am. 2000, ch. 80, § 1, p. 168; am. 2006, ch. 198, § 2, p. 613; am. 2019, ch. 157, § 2, p. 509.

§ 25-1161. Fees — State brand account.

All fees of every kind collected by the office of the state brand inspector or under any rules or regulations made pursuant to the provisions of chapter 11, title 25, Idaho Code, shall be deposited in the state treasury and kept in a special and separate account in the dedicated fund to be known as the “state brand account”; said account is hereby appropriated for the use and expenditure of said board in carrying out the provisions of this chapter and in the performance of all of its duties and the duties of the state brand inspector and in carrying out the rules and regulations which shall be made by the board, and for salaries and wages and other expenses of the office of the state brand inspector, the state brand board, and its employees for the purpose of fulfilling the duties of such office, and said account is hereby declared to be a continuing account.

History.

1947, ch. 88, § 6, p. 149; am. 1973, ch. 168, § 3, p. 339; am. 1977, ch. 183, § 3, p. 510; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 32, p. 111.

§ 25-1162 — 25-1169. [Reserved.]

Any transportation of livestock in this state which originates in another state, and which complies with the brand inspection laws of such state requisite to such transportation, shall be deemed for all purposes to be in compliance with the state brand inspection laws of this state.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-1409, as added by 1973, ch. 168, § 20, p. 339; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 33, p. 111.

§ 25-1171. Impoundment of vehicles used in transporting stolen livestock.

The use of any vehicle for the transportation of any stolen livestock or the products thereof, shall be unlawful and such vehicle shall be forfeited to and confiscated by the state. Any such vehicle so used in transporting such stolen livestock shall be seized without warrant by the sheriff of the county where such vehicle is found and sold by him at public auction and the proceeds of such sale paid to the county treasurer to be deposited in the current expense fund of the county; provided, however, that no such sale shall be made until ten (10) days notice thereof shall have been given the person in whose custody such vehicle is found, and notice given to the registered owner of said vehicle, nor in the event, if within such period the owner of such vehicle or the person entitled to the possession thereof shall commence an action in prohibition or injunction against the sheriff to restrain such sale, until after the termination of such proceedings; and provided, further, that such vehicle shall not be confiscated or subject to the forfeiture if the same be a stolen vehicle or loaned vehicle at the time it is used for such unlawful transportation and the owner thereof is not in collusion with the party or parties guilty of the theft.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-1408, as added by 1973, ch. 168, § 20, p. 339; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 34, p. 111.

§ 25-1172. Impoundment of livestock if no satisfactory evidence of ownership.

Livestock which shall be found by any brand inspector, deputy brand inspector or peace officer of the state in the possession of any person who shall be unable to furnish to such inspector or peace officer, upon request therefor, satisfactory evidence of the ownership of such livestock or the right to possession thereof, may be taken into the possession of such inspector or peace officer and detained by him without liability, and at the expense of the owner thereof, until the ownership of such livestock shall be established. No livestock shall be released to the owner thereof until all costs and expenses of detaining said livestock have been paid. If the ownership of any such livestock shall not be established within ten (10) days from the time such inspector or other officer shall take the same into possession, such inspector or other officer may have such livestock sold at public sale in any auction house or sales ring at which livestock of this nature are customarily sold and the costs of sale and the costs of keeping the livestock before the sale thereof shall be paid from the sale proceeds and the balance of such proceeds shall be paid to the treasurer of the state of Idaho for deposit in the unclaimed livestock proceeds account.

In the event any such livestock shall be delivered to any sales ring, slaughter facility or auction house for sale prior to the time that possession thereof shall be taken by an officer, then the officer may permit the sale of such livestock at such auction house, slaughter facility or sales ring and impound the proceeds from the sale thereof until the ownership of such proceeds shall be established.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-1410, as added by 1973, ch. 168, § 20, p. 339; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 35, p. 111; am. 1992, ch. 65, § 1, p. 198.

§ 25-1173. Unclaimed livestock proceeds account.

There is hereby created in the state treasury an account to be known as the unclaimed livestock proceeds account which shall consist of all money directed by law to be placed therein. The account is appropriated for paying and satisfying such claims as may be allowed against the account by virtue of any law of the state of Idaho. All proceeds from the sale of livestock as provided by section 25-1172, Idaho Code, remaining after payment of the costs of keeping the livestock and the costs of sale, shall be paid to the state treasurer and shall be deposited into the account. All moneys which shall hereafter be impounded under the provisions of section 25-1172, Idaho Code, to which ownership shall not be established within sixty (60) days after the sale of the livestock from which such proceeds shall be received, shall be paid to the state treasurer and shall be deposited into the account.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-1411, as added by 1973, ch. 168, § 20, p. 339; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 36, p. 111.

§ 25-1174. Hearing for claims to livestock proceeds account.

Any person claiming to be the owner of any livestock sold under the provisions of section 25-1172, Idaho Code, may claim the sale proceeds placed in the unclaimed livestock proceeds account, and the state brand inspector must inquire into such claim, and may hold a hearing for such purpose giving notice thereof to every claimant thereof at least thirty (30) days before the date set for such hearing and after such hearing if satisfied of any claimant’s right thereto, must issue an order granting a certificate to that effect and upon the presentation of the certificate the state controller must draw his warrant on the treasurer for the amount without interest. If no such certificate is presented to the state controller within eighteen (18) months after the date, such money is paid into the treasury of the state of Idaho and such money shall escheat to the state and be deposited into the office of the state board of education’s miscellaneous revenue fund for appropriation to public education and/or higher education programs that advance the livestock industry and agriculture in general, as recommended by the Idaho cattle foundation, inc. Such recommendation shall be given to the state board of education no later than April 15 of each year.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-1412, as added by 1973, ch. 168, § 20, p. 339; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 37, p. 111; am. 1994, ch. 180, § 39, p. 420; am. 2012, ch. 151, § 1, p. 421.

§ 25-1175 — 25-1179. [Reserved.]

It shall be unlawful for any stock grower or other person in this state to change, conceal, deface, disfigure, or obliterate any brand or mark previously branded, impressed or marked on any animal or head of livestock, or put his own, or any other brand upon or over any part of any brand previously branded, upon any animal or head of livestock, and no person must mark or use any counterfeit of any brand or mark provided for in this chapter. Any person violating any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

1880, p. 295, § 10; am. R.S., § 1178; compiled and reen. R.C., § 1238; am. 1911, ch. 217, § 9, p. 699; reen. C.L., § 1238; C.S., § 1931; I.C.A.,§ 24-1015; am. 1937, ch. 135, § 7, p. 216; am. 1973, ch. 168, § 18, p. 339; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 38, p. 111.

§ 25-1181. Penalties.

Any person who shall present false or fraudulent information to obtain a brand inspection certificate shall be guilty of a felony.

Any person who wilfully forges any brand inspection certificate or written permit, or alters the same in any manner, with the intent to defraud another, or with the intent to deceive any state brand inspector or any other law enforcement officer in the state of Idaho, shall be guilty of forgery.

Any person who shall knowingly transport livestock without proper certificate or permit, or knowingly offers for shipment any livestock not his own or without the authority of the owner of said livestock shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who shall, without proper brand inspection certificate or written permit, transport livestock in violation of this chapter shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined a sum not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months or be punished by both fine and imprisonment.

Any person who shall refuse to permit inspection of any livestock as required by this chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined a sum not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months or be punished by both fine and imprisonment; and provided further, such person may be liable for civil damages to any owner of such livestock injured thereby, plus treble damages and for costs of suit and attorney’s fees.

It shall be unlawful for any common carrier to transport livestock within or without the state of Idaho without having had the required brand inspections required by this chapter, and any common carrier who knowingly violates the requirements of this chapter shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof, shall be fined a sum not less than three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000); and provided further, that said common carriers may be liable for civil damages to any owner of such livestock who is injured thereby plus treble damages and for costs of suit and attorney’s fees. Any person who transports livestock within or without the state of Idaho without having had the brand inspection required by this chapter, and who has not previously violated this section, is guilty of an infraction. Any subsequent violation of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not less than three hundred dollars ($300) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or by both a fine and imprisonment.

Any person who shall violate any of the rules adopted by the state brand board for the implementation of this chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined a sum not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months or be punished by both fine and imprisonment.

It shall be a misdemeanor to brand any livestock with a recorded brand, when such livestock is not owned by the owner or owners of the recorded brand used.

It shall be a felony to brand any livestock with a recorded brand, when such livestock is not owned by the owner or owners of the recorded brand used, for the purpose of committing or facilitating the theft of said livestock.

History.
I.C.,§ 25-1415, as added by 1973, ch. 168, § 20, p. 339; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 39, p. 111; am. 1995, ch. 123, § 1, p. 539; am. 1996, ch. 90, § 4, p. 271; am. 1997, ch. 105, § 3, p. 246.

§ 25-1182. Issuance of citations and arrest of violators.

The state brand inspector, all deputy brand inspectors and all peace officers authorized by the laws of the state of Idaho to enforce brand inspection laws, are authorized and it is hereby made their duty to arrest with or without warrant any person or persons found violating any of the provisions of the brand inspection laws of the state of Idaho when detected in the act of violating such law or laws or found with livestock unlawfully in their possession at the time of such arrest. Arrests made pursuant to the brand inspection laws of the state of Idaho may be affected by:

Taking the offender into custody for immediate appearance before the nearest available magistrate having jurisdiction; or,

Issuing a citation to the offender to appear before a magistrate. Said citation shall bear the date, time and place for the offender’s appearance before a magistrate; the name and address of the offender, the offense charged, the approximate location where and the approximate time when the offense was committed and other such essential and descriptive information related to the offense as may be prescribed by the state brand board by rule or regulation adopted by said state brand board. The citation shall be signed by the offender notified to appear and he shall be given a copy thereof and thereupon may be released from custody. A citation shall be issued only by mutual agreement of the arresting officer and the offender as evidenced by both their signatures on said citation. Failure of the offender to appear at the time and place specified in the citation shall constitute a misdemeanor and shall be cause for issuance of a warrant for said offender’s arrest.

Whenever any person is given a written citation containing a notice to appear as hereinabove provided, the magistrate shall be a magistrate within the county where the offense charged is alleged to have been committed and who has jurisdiction of the offense, or any other magistrate in any other county with jurisdiction over the alleged offense which is agreed to be more convenient by both the officer and the offender. Whenever an offender is taken immediately before a magistrate as hereinabove provided, it shall be any magistrate within the state of Idaho who has jurisdiction of the alleged offense.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-1414, as added by 1973, ch. 168, § 20, p. 339; am. and redesig. 1988, ch. 75, § 40, p. 111.

§ 25-1120. Brand inspection.

§ 25-1140. Use of brands restricted.

§ 25-1160. Brand inspection fees.

§ 25-1170. Reciprocity.

§ 25-1180. Mutilating and counterfeiting brands a misdemeanor.